Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.46, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Relocation of facilities; reimbursement. new text begin (a)new text end Whenever the commissioner determines that the relocation of any utility facility is necessitated by the construction of a project on the routes of federally aided trunk highways, including urban extensions thereof, that are included within the National System of Interstate Highways, the owner or operator of the utility facility must relocate the utility facility in accordance with the order of the commissioner. Except as provided in section 161.45, subdivision 6, paragraph (d), or 7, upon the completion of relocation of a utility facility, the cost of relocation must be ascertained and paid out of the trunk highway fund by the commissioner, provided the amount paid by the commissioner for reimbursement to a utility does not exceed the amount on which the federal government bases its reimbursement for the interstate highway system. new text begin (b) When a local unit of government, as defined in section 18B.01, subdivision 14a, or Minnesota Tribal government, as defined in section 10.65, subdivision 2, owns a utility system for supplying light, water, sanitary sewer service, or storm sewer service and the system is authorized by law to use a public highway for the location of the utility facility, the remaining service life of the utility must be determined by the commissioner and must be paid out of the trunk highway fund whenever the commissioner determines that a relocation of the system is required by the construction of a project on the trunk highway system. new text end